Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4483.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5c. (1) A license to carry a concealed pistol shall must be in a form, with the same dimensions as a Michigan operator license, prescribed by the department of state police. Beginning December 1, 2015, the The license shall must be constructed of plastic laminated paper or hard plastic. No additional fee shall may be charged for the license unless otherwise prescribed in this act. A fee not to exceed $10.00 may be charged for an optional hard plastic license only if the county clerk also provides the option of obtaining a plastic laminated paper license at no charge. A county clerk shall deposit a fee collected under this subsection in the concealed pistol licensing fund of that county created in section 5x. The license shall must contain all of the following: (a) The licensee's full name and date of birth. (b) A photograph and a physical description of the licensee. (c) A statement of the effective dates of the license. (d) An indication of exceptions authorized by this act applicable to the licensee. (e) The licensee's state-issued driver license or personal identification card number. (f) The premises on which carrying a concealed pistol is prohibited under section 5o. (g) The peace officer disclosure required under section 5f(3). (h) An indication whether the license is a duplicate or an emergency license. (i) If the license is an emergency license, an indication that the emergency license does not exempt the individual from complying with all applicable laws for the purchase of firearms. (j) A QR code that links to the concealed pistol license reciprocity website established and maintained by the department of attorney general under section 5p. (2) The department of state police or a county clerk shall not require a licensee's signature to appear on a license to carry a concealed pistol. (3) Subject to section 5o and except as otherwise provided by law, a license to carry a concealed pistol issued by the county clerk authorizes the licensee to do all of the following: (a) Carry a pistol concealed on or about his or her the licensee's person anywhere in this state. (b) Carry a pistol in a vehicle, whether concealed or not concealed, anywhere in this state. (4) The secretary of state shall make a digitized photograph taken of the applicant for a driver license or personal identification card available to the department for use under this act. The department shall provide the photograph of the applicant received from the secretary of state to the county clerk who shall use the photograph on the individual's license unless the applicant does not have a digitized photograph on file with the secretary of state. If an applicant does not have a digitized photograph on file with the secretary of state, the applicant shall provide a passport-quality photograph of the applicant as provided under section 5b(1). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4481 (request no. H02428'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.